src/morphology/stems/adverbs.lexc
!!  !!!Adverb classification
!!  Adverbs are a heterogenous mass of words with defective inflectional,
!!  usually sourced from various forms of nominals. It would be possible to
!!  classify adverbs along etymology and semantics, but we do not yet use such
!!  classification. Only the morphology is recorded in the continuation classes
!!  and analyses.

LEXICON ADV_AIKANSA

:	ADP_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON ADV_IKINÄ

:	ADP_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;


LEXICON ADV_JO

:	ADP_BACK_CLIT_KO ;

:	# ;


LEXICON ADV_JONNE

:	ADP_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

:	ADP_BACK_CLIT_KA ;


LEXICON ADV_KUHUN

:	ADP_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

:	ADP_BACK_CLIT_KA_S ;


LEXICON ADV_LEVÄLLEEN

:	ADP_FRONT_POSS_EN_OBL ;


LEXICON ADV_MITEN

:	ADP_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

:	ADP_FRONT_CLIT_KA_S ;


LEXICON ADV_NOPEASTI

:	ADP_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON ADV_TYHMÄSTI

:	ADP_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON ADV_VAAN

:	# ;


LEXICON ADV_YLIPÄÄNSÄ

:	ADP_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

LEXICON ADVERB
aikansa+Pcle:aikansa  ADV_AIKANSA  ;
aivankuin+Pcle:aivankuin  ADV_VAAN  ;
ajattomasti+Pcle:ajattomasti  ADV_NOPEASTI  ;
allegorisesti+Pcle:allegorisesti  ADV_NOPEASTI  ;
ani+Pcle:ani  ADV_VAAN  ;
arvokkaasti+Pcle:arvokkaasti  ADV_NOPEASTI  ;
avo+Pcle:avo  ADV_VAAN  ;
definiittisesti+Pcle:definiittisesti  ADV_TYHMÄSTI  ;
demografisesti+Pcle:demografisesti  ADV_NOPEASTI  ;
edessä+Pcle:edessä  ADV_IKINÄ  ;
ehkä+Pcle:ehkä  ADV_VAAN  ;
eksyksistä+Pcle:eksyksistä  ADV_TYHMÄSTI  ;
ennenku+Pcle:ennenku  ADV_VAAN  ;
ennätysmäisesti+Pcle:ennätysmäisesti  ADV_TYHMÄSTI  ;
ensiluokkaisesti+Pcle:ensiluokkaisesti  ADV_NOPEASTI  ;
entiselleen+Pcle:entiselleen  ADV_LEVÄLLEEN  ;
epäsäännöllisesti+Pcle:epäsäännöllisesti  ADV_TYHMÄSTI  ;
eriaikaisesti+Pcle:eriaikaisesti  ADV_NOPEASTI  ;
erilleen+Pcle:erilleen  ADV_LEVÄLLEEN  ;
eristyksissä+Pcle:eristyksissä  ADV_IKINÄ  ;
etelämmäs+Pcle:etelämmäs  ADV_TYHMÄSTI  ;
et+Pcle:et  ADV_VAAN  ;
foneettisesti+Pcle:foneettisesti  ADV_NOPEASTI  ;
hajamielisesti+Pcle:hajamielisesti  ADV_TYHMÄSTI  ;
haralleen+Pcle:haralleen  ADV_NOPEASTI  ;
hela+Pcle:hela  ADV_VAAN  ;
hereästi+Pcle:hereästi  ADV_TYHMÄSTI  ;
hiljempaa+Pcle:hiljempaa  ADV_NOPEASTI  ;
huostasta+Pcle:huostasta  ADV_NOPEASTI  ;
huut+Pcle:huut  ADV_VAAN  ;
hyvilleen+Pcle:hyvilleen  ADV_LEVÄLLEEN  ;
hyväkseen+Pcle:hyväkseen  ADV_LEVÄLLEEN  ;
hyökkäävästi+Pcle:hyökkäävästi  ADV_TYHMÄSTI  ;
häkellyksissä+Pcle:häkellyksissä  ADV_IKINÄ  ;
hämilleen+Pcle:hämilleen  ADV_LEVÄLLEEN  ;
hämäännyksissä+Pcle:hämäännyksissä  ADV_IKINÄ  ;
höröllä+Pcle:höröllä  ADV_IKINÄ  ;
höröllään+Pcle:höröllään  ADV_TYHMÄSTI  ;
ikänä+Pcle:ikänä  ADV_IKINÄ  ;
ikäänkuin+Pcle:ikäänkuin  ADV_VAAN  ;
ilmatiiviisti+Pcle:ilmatiiviisti  ADV_TYHMÄSTI  ;
irrationaalisesti+Pcle:irrationaalisesti  ADV_NOPEASTI  ;
itsekseen+Pcle:itsekseen  ADV_LEVÄLLEEN  ;
itsepäisesti+Pcle:itsepäisesti  ADV_TYHMÄSTI  ;
johon+Pcle:johon  ADV_JONNE  ;
jokos+Pcle:jokos  ADV_VAAN  ;
jolloin+Pcle:jolloin  ADV_JONNE  ;
jonne+Pcle:jonne  ADV_JONNE  ;
jo+Pcle:jo  ADV_JO  ;
josta+Pcle:josta  ADV_JONNE  ;
jota+Pcle:jota  ADV_VAAN  ;
julmetusti+Pcle:julmetusti  ADV_NOPEASTI  ;
jäljestä+Pcle:jäljestä  ADV_IKINÄ  ;
jälleen+Pcle:jälleen  ADV_TYHMÄSTI  ;
kaikitenkin+Pcle:kaikitenkin  ADV_VAAN  ;
kamalasti+Pcle:kamalasti  ADV_NOPEASTI  ;
kansainvälisesti+Pcle:kansainvälisesti  ADV_TYHMÄSTI  ;
kauimpaa+Pcle:kauimpaa  ADV_NOPEASTI  ;
kautta% rantain+Pcle:kautta% rantain  ADV_VAAN  ;
kelteisilleen+Pcle:kelteisilleen  ADV_LEVÄLLEEN  ;
keskeltä+Pcle:keskeltä  ADV_IKINÄ  ;
keskestä+Pcle:keskestä  ADV_IKINÄ  ;
keskeyksissä+Pcle:keskeyksissä  ADV_TYHMÄSTI  ;
kierosti+Pcle:kierosti  ADV_NOPEASTI  ;
kintereillä+Pcle:kintereillä  ADV_IKINÄ  ;
kireästi+Pcle:kireästi  ADV_TYHMÄSTI  ;
kohta+Pcle:kohta  ADV_NOPEASTI  ;
konsanaan+Pcle:konsanaan  ADV_VAAN  ;
koska+Pcle:koska  ADV_KUHUN  ;
kotoisin+Pcle:kotoisin  ADV_NOPEASTI  ;
kuhun+Pcle:kuhun  ADV_KUHUN  ;
kuinka+Pcle:kuinka  ADV_KUHUN  ;
kuis+Pcle:kuis  ADV_KUHUN  ;
kunne+Pcle:kunne  ADV_KUHUN  ;
kunnittain+Pcle:kunnittain  ADV_NOPEASTI  ;
kun+Pcle:kun  ADV_VAAN  ;
kussa+Pcle:kussa  ADV_KUHUN  ;
kusta+Pcle:kusta  ADV_KUHUN  ;
kyljelleen+Pcle:kyljelleen  ADV_LEVÄLLEEN  ;
kylmilleen+Pcle:kylmilleen  ADV_LEVÄLLEEN  ;
kynsissä+Pcle:kynsissä  ADV_IKINÄ  ;
kyykkysilleen+Pcle:kyykkysilleen  ADV_LEVÄLLEEN  ;
kyykylleen+Pcle:kyykylleen  ADV_LEVÄLLEEN  ;
kyyrylleen+Pcle:kyyrylleen  ADV_LEVÄLLEEN  ;
kärsimättömästi+Pcle:kärsimättömästi  ADV_TYHMÄSTI  ;
käsissä+Pcle:käsissä  ADV_IKINÄ  ;
käymäseltä+Pcle:käymäseltä  ADV_IKINÄ  ;
lahjakkaasti+Pcle:lahjakkaasti  ADV_NOPEASTI  ;
lainkaan+Pcle:lainkaan  ADV_VAAN  ;
levälleen+Pcle:levälleen  ADV_LEVÄLLEEN  ;
likeltä+Pcle:likeltä  ADV_IKINÄ  ;
likimaille+Pcle:likimaille  ADV_NOPEASTI  ;
likimpänä+Pcle:likimpänä  ADV_TYHMÄSTI  ;
läheisyydestä+Pcle:läheisyydestä  ADV_IKINÄ  ;
läheltä+Pcle:läheltä  ADV_IKINÄ  ;
lähestulkoonkaan+Pcle:lähestulkoonkaan  ADV_VAAN  ;
lähettyviltä+Pcle:lähettyviltä  ADV_IKINÄ  ;
läntälleen+Pcle:läntälleen  ADV_LEVÄLLEEN  ;
läpi+Pcle:läpi  ADV_TYHMÄSTI  ;
lääpälleen+Pcle:lääpälleen  ADV_LEVÄLLEEN  ;
mainiosti+Pcle:mainiosti  ADV_NOPEASTI  ;
menehdyksissä+Pcle:menehdyksissä  ADV_IKINÄ  ;
mennessä+Pcle:mennessä  ADV_IKINÄ  ;
mielestä+Pcle:mielestä  ADV_IKINÄ  ;
mihin+Pcle:mihin  ADV_MITEN  ;
miksi+Pcle:miksi  ADV_MITEN  ;
milloin+Pcle:milloin  ADV_KUHUN  ;
minne+Pcle:minne  ADV_MITEN  ;
missäkin+Pcle:missäkin  ADV_VAAN  ;
missä+Pcle:missä  ADV_MITEN  ;
missään+Pcle:missään  ADV_TYHMÄSTI  ;
miten+Pcle:miten  ADV_MITEN  ;
mitä+Pcle:mitä  ADV_MITEN  ;
murteittain+Pcle:murteittain  ADV_NOPEASTI  ;
myöhäisintään+Pcle:myöhäisintään  ADV_VAAN  ;
niikseen+Pcle:niikseen  ADV_TYHMÄSTI  ;
nykyiselleen+Pcle:nykyiselleen  ADV_LEVÄLLEEN  ;
ny+Pcle:ny  ADV_VAAN  ;
näkyviltä+Pcle:näkyviltä  ADV_IKINÄ  ;
oikeesti+Pcle:oikeesti  ADV_NOPEASTI  ;
paitsi+Pcle:paitsi  ADV_VAAN  ;
par’aikaa+Pcle:par’aikaa  ADV_NOPEASTI  ;
peitetysti+Pcle:peitetysti  ADV_TYHMÄSTI  ;
perältä+Pcle:perältä  ADV_IKINÄ  ;
piiristä+Pcle:piiristä  ADV_IKINÄ  ;
pitempään+Pcle:pitempään  ADV_TYHMÄSTI  ;
pitkälleen+Pcle:pitkälleen  ADV_LEVÄLLEEN  ;
plus+Pcle:plus  ADV_VAAN  ;
poikkeavasti+Pcle:poikkeavasti  ADV_NOPEASTI  ;
päinsä+Pcle:päinsä  ADV_TYHMÄSTI  ;
pääkohdittain+Pcle:pääkohdittain  ADV_NOPEASTI  ;
päällä+Pcle:päällä  ADV_IKINÄ  ;
pörhölleen+Pcle:pörhölleen  ADV_LEVÄLLEEN  ;
pörhöllä+Pcle:pörhöllä  ADV_IKINÄ  ;
pörrölleen+Pcle:pörrölleen  ADV_LEVÄLLEEN  ;
pötkölleen+Pcle:pötkölleen  ADV_LEVÄLLEEN  ;
pöyhölleen+Pcle:pöyhölleen  ADV_LEVÄLLEEN  ;
raivoihinsa+Pcle:raivoihinsa  ADV_AIKANSA  ;
ristikkäisesti+Pcle:ristikkäisesti  ADV_TYHMÄSTI  ;
romanttisesti+Pcle:romanttisesti  ADV_NOPEASTI  ;
rähmälleen+Pcle:rähmälleen  ADV_LEVÄLLEEN  ;
saatikka+Pcle:saatikka  ADV_VAAN  ;
selkoselälleen+Pcle:selkoselälleen  ADV_LEVÄLLEEN  ;
selälleen+Pcle:selälleen  ADV_LEVÄLLEEN  ;
senjälkeen+Pcle:senjälkeen  ADV_TYHMÄSTI  ;
sentähden+Pcle:sentähden  ADV_VAAN  ;
seuraavasti+Pcle:seuraavasti  ADV_NOPEASTI  ;
silmässä+Pcle:silmässä  ADV_IKINÄ  ;
sinunlaisesi+Pcle:sinunlaisesi  ADV_VAAN  ;
sirrilleen+Pcle:sirrilleen  ADV_LEVÄLLEEN  ;
sisinnä+Pcle:sisinnä  ADV_TYHMÄSTI  ;
sisällä+Pcle:sisällä  ADV_IKINÄ  ;
stop+Pcle:stop  ADV_VAAN  ;
suggestiivisesti+Pcle:suggestiivisesti  ADV_NOPEASTI  ;
sydänverellä+Pcle:sydänverellä  ADV_IKINÄ  ;
syrjemmäksi+Pcle:syrjemmäksi  ADV_TYHMÄSTI  ;
syrjälleen+Pcle:syrjälleen  ADV_LEVÄLLEEN  ;
säntilleen+Pcle:säntilleen  ADV_LEVÄLLEEN  ;
tahikka+Pcle:tahikka  ADV_VAAN  ;
taiturillisesti+Pcle:taiturillisesti  ADV_NOPEASTI  ;
takaisinpäin+Pcle:takaisinpäin  ADV_TYHMÄSTI  ;
teollisesti+Pcle:teollisesti  ADV_NOPEASTI  ;
todesta+Pcle:todesta  ADV_VAAN  ;
tuloksellisesti+Pcle:tuloksellisesti  ADV_NOPEASTI  ;
turhanpäiväisesti+Pcle:turhanpäiväisesti  ADV_TYHMÄSTI  ;
tuskinpa+Pcle:tuskinpa  ADV_VAAN  ;
tyhjilleen+Pcle:tyhjilleen  ADV_LEVÄLLEEN  ;
tyköä+Pcle:tyköä  ADV_IKINÄ  ;
täydellisesti+Pcle:täydellisesti  ADV_TYHMÄSTI  ;
töppösilleen+Pcle:töppösilleen  ADV_LEVÄLLEEN  ;
törrölleen+Pcle:törrölleen  ADV_LEVÄLLEEN  ;
törölleen+Pcle:törölleen  ADV_LEVÄLLEEN  ;
uppeluksissa+Pcle:uppeluksissa  ADV_NOPEASTI  ;
vaa+Pcle:vaa  ADV_VAAN  ;
vain+Pcle:vain  ADV_VAAN  ;
varresta+Pcle:varresta  ADV_NOPEASTI  ;
vastapäätä+Pcle:vastapäätä  ADV_IKINÄ  ;
verraten+Pcle:verraten  ADV_VAAN  ;
vierestä+Pcle:vierestä  ADV_IKINÄ  ;
vierettäin+Pcle:vierettäin  ADV_TYHMÄSTI  ;
voimattomasti+Pcle:voimattomasti  ADV_NOPEASTI  ;
vähääkään+Pcle:vähääkään  ADV_VAAN  ;
väistämättä+Pcle:väistämättä  ADV_TYHMÄSTI  ;
väsyksissä+Pcle:väsyksissä  ADV_IKINÄ  ;
yksitellen+Pcle:yksitellen  ADV_TYHMÄSTI  ;
ylimmilleen+Pcle:ylimmilleen  ADV_LEVÄLLEEN  ;
ylipäänsä+Pcle:ylipäänsä  ADV_YLIPÄÄNSÄ  ;
yllin+Pcle:yllin  ADV_VAAN  ;
yllä+Pcle:yllä  ADV_IKINÄ  ;
ymmälleen+Pcle:ymmälleen  ADV_LEVÄLLEEN  ;
ymmärtääkseen+Pcle:ymmärtääkseen  ADV_LEVÄLLEEN  ;
ympäriltä+Pcle:ympäriltä  ADV_IKINÄ  ;
äidillisesti+Pcle:äidillisesti  ADV_TYHMÄSTI  ;
äärellä+Pcle:äärellä  ADV_IKINÄ  ;
äärimmilleen+Pcle:äärimmilleen  ADV_LEVÄLLEEN  ;
